Hawaii statutes.
§328J‑7 Exceptions.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, the
following areas shall be exempt from the provisions of sections 328J‑3,
328J‑4, and 328J‑5:

(1) Private residences, except when used as a
licensed child care, adult day care, or health care facility;

(2) Hotel and motel rooms that are rented to guests
and are designated as smoking rooms; provided that not more than twenty per
cent of rooms rented to guests in a hotel or motel may be so designated. All
smoking rooms on the same floor shall be contiguous and smoke from these rooms
shall not infiltrate into areas where smoking is prohibited under this
chapter. The status of rooms as smoking or nonsmoking may not be changed,
except to add additional nonsmoking rooms;

(3) Retail tobacco stores; provided that smoke from
these places shall not infiltrate into areas where smoking is prohibited under
this chapter;

(4) Private and semiprivate rooms in nursing homes
and long-term care facilities that are occupied by one or more persons, all of
whom are smokers and have requested in writing to be placed in a room where
smoking is permitted; provided that smoke from these places shall not
infiltrate into areas where smoking is prohibited under this chapter;

(5) Outdoor areas of places of employment except
those covered by the provisions of sections 328J‑3 and 328J‑5;

(6) All areas covered by this chapter when smoking is
part of a production being filmed; and

(7) State correctional facilities; provided that
smoking shall only be authorized for employees and volunteers of a correctional
facility in an area outside the secure confines of a correctional facility
restricted from access by inmates or detainees that has been designated by the
warden of a correctional facility. [L 2006, c 295, pt of §2; am L 2009, c 99,
§1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next